nb: Elektronikk > Utskrift, kopi, skann og faks > Skannere: 3D-skannere; Bokskannere; Trommelskannere; Filmskannere; Flatskannere; Fotoskannere; Bærbare skannere; Arkmatede skannere
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > พิมพ์ คัดลอก สแกน และแฟกซ์ > สแกนเนอร์: เครื่องสแกน 3D; เครื่องสแกนหนังสือ; เครื่องสแกนแบบดรัม; เครื่องสแกนฟิล์ม; เครื่องสแกนแบบแท่นนอน; เครื่องสแกนภาพถ่าย; เครื่องสแกนแบบพกพา; เครื่องสแกนแบบเลื่อนกระดาษ
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 多功能事務機 > 掃描器: 3D 掃描儀; 書籍掃描儀; 滾輪掃描器; 底片掃描器; 平台掃描器; 相片掃描器; 攜帶型掃描器; 饋紙型掃描器
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 打印/复印/扫描/传真 > 扫描仪: 3D 扫描仪; 书本扫描仪; 鼓式扫描仪; 胶片扫描仪; 平板扫描仪; 照片扫描仪; 便携式扫描仪; 馈纸式扫描仪
fi: Elektroniikka > Tulostus, kopiointi, skannaus ja faksaus > Skannerit: 3D-skanneri; Kirjaskanneri; Rumpuskannerit; Filmiskannerit; Tasoskannerit; Valokuvaskannerit; Kannettavat skannerit; Arkinsyöttöskannerit
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Impressão, cópia, digitalização e fax > Scanners: Scanners 3D; Scanners de livros; Scanners de tambor; Scanners de filme; Scanners de mesa; Scanners de fotos; Scanners portáteis; Scanners alimentados por folhas
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Impressão, cópia, digitalização e fax > Leitores: Scanners 3D; Scanners de livros; Scanners de tambor; Scanners de filme; Scanners de base plana; Scanners de fotos; Scanners portáteis; Scanners de alimentação de folhas
tr: Elektronik > Yazıcı, Fotokopi, Tarayıcı ve Faks > Tarayıcılar: 3D Tarayıcılar; Kitap Tarayıcıları; Tambur Tarayıcılar; Film Tarayıcılar; Düz Yataklı Tarayıcılar; Fotoğraf Tarayıcılar; Taşınabilir Tarayıcılar; Sayfa Beslemeli Tarayıcılar
es: Electrónica > Fax, escáner, copiadora e impresora > Escáneres: Escáneres 3D; Escáneres de libros; Escáneres de tambor; Escáneres de película; Escáneres de superficie plana; Escáneres fotográficos; Escáneres portátiles; Escáneres de alimentación de hojas
fr: Appareil électronique > Impression, copie, numérisation et télécopie > Scanners: Scanners 3D; Scanners de livres; Scanners à tambour; Scanners à pellicules; Scanners à plateau; Scanners photo; Scanners portables; Scanners à défilement
sk-SK: Elektronika > Tlač, kopírovanie, skenovanie a faxovanie > Skenery: 3D skenery; Knižné skenery; Bubnové skenery; Filmové skenery; Ploché skenery; Fotoskenery; Prenosné skenery; Listové skenery
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > In, photocopy, quét & fax > Máy quét: Máy quét 3D; Máy quét sách; Máy quét trống; Máy quét phim; Máy quét phẳng; Máy quét ảnh; Máy quét cầm tay; Máy quét nạp giấy tự động
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Εκτύπωση, Αντιγραφή, Σάρωση & Φαξ > Σαρωτές: Σαρωτές 3D; Σαρωτές βιβλίων; Σαρωτές τυμπάνων; Σαρωτές φιλμ; Επιτραπέζιοι σαρωτές; Σαρωτές φωτογραφιών; Φορητοί σαρωτές; Σαρωτές με τροφοδοσία φύλλων
de: Elektronik > Drucken, Kopieren, Scannen & Faxen > Scanner: 3D-Scanner; Buchscanner; Trommelscanner; Folienscanner; Flachbettscanner; Fotoscanner; Tragbare Scanner; Bogenscanner
it: Elettronica > Stampa, copia, scansione e fax > Scanner: Scanner 3D; Scanner di libri; Scanner a tamburo; Scanner per pellicole; Scanner piani; Scanner fotografici; Scanner portatili; Scanner a fogli
nl: Elektronica > Afdrukken, kopiëren, scannen en faxen > Scanners: 3d-scanners; Boekscanners; Trommelscanners; Filmscanners; Flatbedscanners; Fotoscanners; Draagbare scanners; Scanners met velleninvoer
cs: Elektronika > Tisk, kopírování, skenování a faxování > Skenery: 3D skenery; Knižní skenery; Bubnové skenery; Skenery na filmy; Ploché skenery; Skenery fotografií; Přenosné skenery; Skenery s podavačem
ro-RO: Electronice > Imprimare, copiere, scanare și fax > Scanere: Scanere 3D; Scanere pentru cărți; Scanere cu cilindru; Scanere pentru film; Scanere plate; Scanere pentru fotografii; Scanere portabile; Scanere pentru documente
lt-LT: Elektronika > Spausdinimas, kopijavimas, nuskaitymas ir faksas > Skaitytuvai: 3D skaitytuvai; Knygų skaitytuvai; Būgnų skaitytuvai; Juostelių skaitytuvai; Plokštieji skaitytuvai; Nuotraukų skaitytuvai; Nešiojamieji skaitytuvai; Skaitytuvai su lapų tiektuvais
pl: Elektronika > Drukowanie, kopiowanie, skanowanie i faksowanie > Skanery: Skanery 3D; Skanery książek; Skanery bębnowe; Skanery do filmów; Skanery płaskie; Skanery fotograficzne; Skanery przenośne; Skanery z podajnikiem
hu: Elektronika > Nyomtatás, másolás, szkennelés és faxolás > Szkennerek: 3D-szkennerek; Könyvszkennerek; Dobszkennerek; Filmszkennerek; Síkágyas szkennerek; Fényképszkennerek; Hordozható szkennerek; Lapolvasók
da: Elektronik > Udskriv, kopiér, scan og fax > Scannere: 3D-scannere; Bogscannere; Tromlescannere; Filmscannere; Flade scannere; Fotoscannere; Bærbare scannere; Arkfødede scannere
ru: Электроника > Печать, копирование, сканирование и работа с факсами > Сканеры: 3D-сканеры; Книжные сканеры; Барабанные сканеры; Сканеры для пленки; Планшетные сканеры; Сканеры для фотографий; Портативные сканеры; Протяжные сканеры
sl-SI: Elektronika > Tiskanje, kopiranje, skeniranje in faksiranje > Optični bralniki: 3D skenerji; Knjižni skenerji; Bobenski optični bralniki; Optični bralniki filmskih trakov; Ploščati optični bralniki; Optični bralniki za fotografije; Prenosni optični bralniki; Optični bralniki z avtomatskim podajalnikom dokumentov
hr-HR: Elektronika > Ispis, kopiranje, skeniranje i faksiranje > Skeneri: 3D skener; Skeneri za knjige; Bubanj skeneri; Filmski skeneri; Ravni skeneri; Foto skeneri; Prijenosni skeneri; Skeneri s listovima
bg-BG: Електроника > Печат, копиране, сканиране и факс > Скенери: 3D скенери; Скенери за книги; Барабанни скенери; Филмови скенери; Плоски скенери; Скенери за снимки; Преносими скенери; Документни скенери
ko: 전자기기 > 인쇄/ 복사/스캔/팩스 > 스캐너: 3D 스캐너; 북 스캐너; 드럼 스캐너; 필름 스캐너; 평판 스캐너; 포토 스캐너; 휴대용 스캐너; 시트 피드 스캐너
ja: 電子機器 > プリンター・コピー機 > スキャナー: 3Dスキャナー; ブックスキャナー; ドラムスキャナー; フィルムスキャナー; フラットベッドスキャナー; フォトスキャナー; ポータブルスキャナー; シートフィードスキャナー
en: Electronics > Print, Copy, Scan & Fax > Scanners: 3D Scanners; Book Scanners; Drum Scanners; Film Scanners; Flatbed Scanners; Photo Scanners; Portable Scanners; Sheetfed Scanners
sv: Elektronik > Utskrift, kopiering, skanning och fax > Skannrar: 3D-skannrar; Bokskannrar; Trumskanner; Filmskanner; Flatbäddsskannrar; Fotoskannrar; Bärbara skannrar; Arkmatade skannrar